District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.14

Fee schedule.

The Mayor shall establish a fee schedule to recover the costs associated with the consideration of an application to close all or part of a street or alley.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 214, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-434.